Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-5] Territorial applicability of the
chapter. (a) This chapter applies throughout the State. It also applies
to all persons otherwise subject to this chapter while they are serving outside
the State, and while they are going to and returning from such service outside
the State, in the same manner and to the same extent as if they were serving
inside the State.

(b) Courts-martial and courts of inquiry may
be convened and held in units of the state military forces while those units
are serving outside the State with the same jurisdiction and powers as to
persons subject to this chapter as if the proceedings were held inside the
State, and offenses committed outside the State may be tried and punished
either inside or outside the State. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next